Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF148.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1200YH (2) 91 da/ns H.F. 148 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 199A.1 Definitions. 1 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise 2 requires: 3 1. âCommercial sodâ or âsodâ means any variety of grass 4 planted on a layer of soil and cut into pallets or rolls for 5 transport and permanent installation on land. 6 2. âDepartmentâ means the department of agriculture and land 7 stewardship. 8 3. âEntwined commercial sodâ means commercial sod that is 9 entwined with plastic netting in a manner that increases its 10 stability. 11 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 199A.2 Sales notice ââ offense. 12 A person engaged in the business of selling commercial sod 13 on a wholesale or retail basis shall not sell or offer for sale 14 entwined commercial sod, unless the person notifies a person 15 purchasing the sod that the sod is entwined commercial sod. 16 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 199A.3 Installation notice ââ offense. 17 A person engaged in the business of installing commercial 18 sod on real property owned by another person shall not install 19 entwined commercial sod on the real property, unless the person 20 notifies a person owning the land that the commercial sod is 21 entwined commercial sod. 22 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 199A.4 Notice requirements. 23 The department shall adopt rules providing requirements for 24 the type of notice required under this chapter. The notice may 25 be in the form of a label, conspicuously placed placard, or 26 written statement that meets requirements established by the 27 department. 28 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 199A.5 Rules. 29 The department shall adopt rules necessary or desirable to 30 administer this chapter. 31 Sec. 6. NEW SECTION . 199A.6 Penalty. 32 A person committing a violation of this chapter is guilty 33 of a simple misdemeanor punishable by a fine of five hundred 34 dollars. 35 -1- LSB 1200YH (2) 91 da/ns 1/ 2 H.F. 148